Utah statutes.
48-2e-810.   Administrative dissolution.

(1)  The division may commence a proceeding under Subsections (2) and (3) to dissolve a limited partnership administratively if the limited partnership does not:

(a)  pay any fee, tax, or penalty required to be paid to the division not later than 60 days after it is due;

(b)  deliver an annual report to the division not later than 60 days after it is due; or

(c)  have a registered agent in this state for 60 consecutive days.

(2)  If the division determines that one or more grounds exist for administratively dissolving a limited partnership, the division shall serve the limited partnership with notice in a record of the division's determination.

(3)  If a limited partnership, not later than 60 days after service of the notice under Subsection (2), does not cure or demonstrate to the satisfaction of the division the nonexistence of each ground determined by the division, the division shall administratively dissolve the limited partnership by signing a statement of administrative dissolution that recites the grounds for dissolution and the effective date of dissolution.  The division shall file the statement and serve a copy on the limited partnership pursuant to Section 48-2e-209.

(4)  A limited partnership that is administratively dissolved continues in existence as an entity but may not carry on any activities except as necessary to wind up its activities and affairs and liquidate its assets under Sections 48-2e-802, 48-2e-806, 48-2e-807, 48-2e-808, and 48-2e-813 or to apply for reinstatement under Section 48-2e-811.

(5)  The administrative dissolution of a limited partnership does not terminate the authority of its registered agent.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

